Illinois, session 104th, SB2307.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Electrician Licensing Act.  6    Section 5. Purpose and policy. Improper electrical wiring 7and building construction can adversely affect the well being 8of the public by causing fires due to short circuits and 9overloading of protection devices. Faulty wiring is 10potentially lethal and can cause widespread fires with 11disastrous consequences to persons and property. To protect 12the health of the public, it is essential that electrical 13wiring be installed by contractors who are registered with the 14state and passed all applicable state standards. To further 15promote health and safety, it is essential that the State 16inquire as to the potential benefits of licensing other 17building trades in consultation with labor and ownership in 18the construction industry.19    Consistent with its duty to safeguard the health of the 20people of this State, the General Assembly declares that the 21planning, inspecting, installing, altering, extending, 22repairing, and maintaining of electrical wiring systems shall 23be performed by entities demonstrating levels of proven skill.   SB2307- 2 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1Further, the General Assembly declares that a guide for 2minimum control of electrical materials and equipment, the 3design of electrical systems, and the construction and 4installation methods of electrical systems is essential for 5the protection of public health. In order to insure proper 6electrical wiring practice, this Act provides for the 7licensing of electrical contractors and supervising 8electricians and for the adoption of the National Electrical 9Code (NFPA70) as standards by the Department. This Act is 10therefore declared to be essential to the public interest.  11    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 12    "Board" means the Illinois State Electrical Licensing 13Advisory Board. 14    "Department" means the Illinois Department of Professional 15Regulation. 16    "Director" means the Director of the Illinois Department 17of Professional Regulation. 18    "Electrical contractor" means a person, firm, or 19corporation operating a business that undertakes or offers to 20undertake to plan for, lay out, supervise, or install or to 21make additions, alterations, maintenance, or repairs in the 22installation of wiring, apparatus, or equipment for electric 23light, heat, or power with or without compensation and who is 24licensed as an electrical contractor by the Department of 25Professional Regulation. An electrical contractor's license   SB2307- 3 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1does not of itself qualify its holder to perform the 2electrical work. The term electrical contractor does not 3include employees employed by such contractor to do or 4supervise such work. 5    "Governmental unit" means a city, village, incorporated 6town, or county. 7    "Owner" means a natural person who physically performs 8electrical work on premises the person owns and actually 9occupies as a single family residence or owns as a single 10family residence upon completion of construction. 11    "Supervising Electrician" means an individual not less 12than twenty-one years of age with at least three years of 13experience in the installation, alteration, repair, and 14maintenance of electrical wires, equipment, and apparatus, or 15an experience equivalent thereto and having passed an exam 16provided by the Department that sufficiently indicates the 17individual has knowledge and technical training to perform the 18work or to supervise the installation, alteration, repair and 19maintenance of electrical wires, equipment, and apparatus.  20    Section 15. Electrical Licensing Advisory Board.21    (a) There is created the Electrical Licensing Advisory 22Board that shall exercise its duties provided in this Act 23under the supervision of the Department. The Board shall 24consist of an executive director, who serves as an ex officio 25member, and 11 members appointed by the governor subject to   SB2307- 4 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1the advice and consent of the Senate. The Board shall be 2composed of the following members: 3        (1) one member must be the chief electrical inspector 4    of a municipality with a population of not less than 5    150,000, according to the most recent federal census, 6    selected from a list of names submitted by a statewide 7    association of municipal governments; 8        (2) one member must be a building code official of a 9    municipality with a population of less than 150,000, 10    according to the most recent federal census, selected from 11    a list of names submitted by a statewide association of 12    municipal governments; 13        (3) one member must be a supervising electrician 14    selected from a list of names submitted by the 15    Homebuilders Association of Illinois; 16        (4) one member must be an electrical contractor 17    selected from a list of names submitted by the Associated 18    Builders & Contractors, Northern Illinois Chapter; 19        (5) one member must be a supervising electrician 20    selected from a list of names submitted by the Illinois 21    State Association of Electrical Workers of the 22    International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers; 23        (6) one member must be an electrical contractor 24    selected from a list of names submitted by the National 25    Electrical Contractors Association, Northeastern Illinois 26    Chapter;   SB2307- 5 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1        (7) one member must be a training director selected 2    from a list of names submitted by the Illinois State 3    Association of Electrical Workers of the International 4    Brotherhood of Electrical Workers; 5        (8) one member must be a training director selected 6    from an Illinois building and contractors association; 7        (9) one member must be a licensed electrical engineer; 8        (10) the State Fire Marshal; and 9        (11) the Director of the Department of Professional 10    Regulation. 11    Members of the Board shall serve 4 year terms and until 12their successors are appointed and qualified. The initial 13appointments, however, shall be as follows: 3 members for 14terms of 2 years, 3 members for 3 years, and 2 members for 4 15years. The State Fire Marshal's service on the Board shall be 16continuous. Board members shall receive no compensation but 17shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in connection with 18their duties as Board members. 19    (b) The Director shall serve as the presiding officer of 20the Board. 21    (c) A majority constitutes a quorum for the transaction of 22business and Roberts Rules of Order shall be the rules by which 23the Board's actions shall be conducted. 24    (d) The Board shall aid the Director and the Department 25by: 26        (1) suggesting rules to govern examinations and   SB2307- 6 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1    hearing for suspension, revocation, or reinstatement of 2    licenses; 3        (2) submitting recommendations to the Director from 4    time to time for the efficient administration of this Act; 5    and 6        (3) performing other duties from time to time as 7    prescribed by the Director.  8    Section 20. Powers and duties of the Director.The Director 9shall: 10    (a) prepare forms for application for electrical 11contractor and supervising electrician licenses and for 12examination for supervising electrician licenses; 13    (b) prepare and issue licenses as provided in this Act; 14    (c) with the aid of the Board, prescribe rules for the 15examination of applicants for supervising electrician 16licenses; 17    (d) with the aid of the Board, prepare and give uniform and 18comprehensive examinations to applicants for supervisory 19electrician licenses that shall test their knowledge and 20qualifications in the planning and design of electrical 21systems, their knowledge, qualifications, and manual skills in 22electrical installations, and their knowledge of the National 23Electrical Code relating to materials, design, and 24installation of methods of electrical systems; 25    (e) issue electrical contractor and supervising   SB2307- 7 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1electrician licenses and license renewals to every applicant 2who has passed the examination and who has paid the required 3license and renewal fee; 4    (f) prescribe rules for hearings to deny, suspend, revoke, 5or reinstate licenses as provided in this Act; 6    (g) establish and collect fees for the examination, 7issuance, and renewal of licenses; and 8    (h) formulate and publish rules necessary or appropriate 9to carrying out the provisions of this Act.  10    Section 25. Licenses.11    (a) Electrical Contractor. Except as otherwise provided by 12law, no person shall plan, install, repair, maintain, lay out, 13or supervise the installation of wiring, apparatus, or 14equipment for electrical light, heat, power, or other purposes 15unless the person: 16        (1) is licensed by the Department as an electrical 17    contractor; 18        (2) provides the Department a bond to the State in the 19    penal sum of $5,000 conditioned upon the faithful and 20    lawful performance of all work entered into by the 21    electrical contractor within the State of Illinois. The 22    bond shall be for the benefit of persons injured or 23    suffering financial loss by reason of failure of 24    performance. The bond shall be filed with the Department 25    and shall be in lieu of all other license bonds to any   SB2307- 8 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1    political subdivision. The bond shall be written by a 2    corporate surety licensed to do business in the State of 3    Illinois; 4        (3) files with the Department a certificate evidencing 5    in effect general liability insurance, that includes 6    premises and operations insurance and products and 7    completed operations insurance, with limits of at least 8    $100,000 per occurrence, $300,000 aggregate limit for 9    bodily injury, and property damage insurance with limits 10    of at least $25,000 or a policy with a single limit for 11    bodily injury and property damage of $300,000 per 12    occurrence and $300,000 aggregate limits. The insurance 13    shall be written by an insurer licensed to do business in 14    the State of Illinois and shall provide that the insurance 15    shall not be cancelled without the insurer first giving 15 16    days written notice to the Department of the cancellation; 17    and 18        (4) has appointed or employed a licensed supervising 19    electrician responsible for the performance of all 20    electrical work in accordance with the requirements of 21    this Act. The application for an electrical contractor's 22    license must include a verified statement that the 23    designated responsible supervising electrician is an 24    individual who is not employed in any capacity as a 25    licensed supervising electrician by any other electrical 26    contractor.   SB2307- 9 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1    (b) Supervising Electrician. Except as otherwise provided 2by law, no person shall wire for, plan, install, maintain, lay 3out, or supervise the installation of wiring, apparatus, or 4equipment for electric light, heat, or power, unless the 5person is licensed by the Department as a supervising 6electrician employed or appointed by a licensed electrical 7contractor. 8    An applicant for a supervising electrician's license shall 9have had at least 2 years of experience, acceptable to the 10Department, in wiring for, installing, and repairing 11electrical wiring, apparatus, or equipment. The Department, 12however, may by rule provide for the allowance of one year of 13experience credit for successful completion of a 2 year post 14high school electrical course approved by the Department.  15    Section 30. Examination. In addition to other requirements 16imposed by this Act and except as otherwise provided in this 17Act, as a precondition to issuance of a supervising 18electrician's license, each applicant must pass a written 19examination given by the Department. The exam shall test their 20knowledge and qualifications in the planning and design of 21electrical systems, their knowledge, qualifications, and 22manual skills in electrical installations, and their knowledge 23of the National Electrical Code relating to materials, design, 24and installation of methods of electrical systems. Any 25licensee failing to renew his or her license for 2 years or   SB2307- 10 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1more after its expiration shall be required to retake the 2examination before he or she is issued a new license.  3    Section 35. Experience requirements.4    (a) Except as otherwise provided for a supervising 5electrician's license under Section 25, an applicant for a 6supervising electrician's license shall meet the experience 7requirements of this Section before examination for licensure. 8    (b) The maximum allowable credit for electrical 9experience: 10        (1) before age 18 is 6 months; 11        (2) in the military service is 12 months; 12        (3) in foreign countries is 12 months; and 13        (4) acquired during the school term of an approved 14    post high school electrical course is 12 months. 15    (c) Experience in the categories of planning for the 16installation of wiring, apparatus, and equipment for light, 17heat, and power; laying out for the installation of wiring, 18apparatus, and equipment for light, heat, and power; 19supervising the installation of wiring, apparatus, and 20equipment for light, heat, and power; and wiring and 21installation of electrical wiring, apparatus, and equipment 22for light, heat, and power is acceptable to the Board in the 23following situations: 24        (1) experience while in the employ of an electrical 25    contractor licensed under this Act;   SB2307- 11 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1        (2) experience while working in Illinois for an 2    employer who is not required to be licensed as an 3    electrical contractor, if the work is inspected and done 4    under the supervision of a properly licensed electrician; 5        (3) experience while performing electrical work in 6    Illinois for an employer who is exempt from licensing when 7    the work is exempt from inspection or when the work is 8    performed on federal property by a federal employee, if 9    the Department has determined in either situation that the 10    experience is substantially equal to that acquired in 11    performing work while in the employ of a licensed 12    electrical contractor; 13        (4) experience while performing electrical work 14    outside of Illinois, which the Department has determined 15    is substantially equivalent to the work performed while in 16    the employ of a licensed electrical contractor in 17    Illinois. This determination must be based on a 18    certification by the employer for the type of work 19    performed.  20    Section 40. Military exemption. The Department shall 21reinstate a supervising electrician license that expires while 22a licensee is in active Military Service of the United States 23upon application to the Department by the licensee within 2 24years after termination of the military service, payment of 25the annual license fee, and submission of evidence of the   SB2307- 12 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1military service. The license shall be reinstated without 2examination and without payment of the lapsed renewal fee.  3    Section 45. License and renewal fees.4    (a) All licenses issued under this Act shall expire 5annually in a manner as provided by the Department. 6    (b) The Department shall provide for fees by rule; 7however, the fees shall not exceed the following amounts: 8        (1) the application fee for a license or temporary 9    license, $100; 10        (2) the fee for renewal of a license, $25; 11        (3) the fee for reinstatement of a license that has 12    been expired for less than 2 years, $50 plus payment of all 13    unpaid renewal fees; 14        (4) the fee for restoration of a license that has been 15    expired for more than 2 years, $100; 16        (5) the fee for issuance of a duplicate license, the 17    issuance of a replacement that has been lost or destroyed, 18    or the issuance of a license with a change of name and 19    address, other than during the renewal period, $25; 20        (6) the fee for certification of a licensee's record 21    for any purpose, $25; 22        (7) the fee for rescoring of an examination, the cost 23    to the Department of rescoring the examination plus any 24    fees charged by the applicable testing service to have the 25    examination rescored;   SB2307- 13 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1        (8) the fee for copies of a license, the actual cost of 2    producing the copies; 3        (9) the fee for a roster of supervising electricians, 4    the actual cost of producing the roster; 5        (10) the fee for application for a license by an 6    electrician registered or licensed under the laws of 7    another state, $100.  8    Section 50. Unlicensed practice; civil penalty. 9    (a) Any person who practices, offers to practice, attempts 10to practice, or holds oneself out to practice as an electrical 11contractor or supervising electrician without being licensed 12under this Act shall, in addition to any other penalty 13provided by law, pay a civil penalty to the Department in an 14amount not to exceed $25,000 for each offense as determined by 15the Department. The civil penalty shall be assessed by 16Director after a hearing is held in accordance with the 17provisions set forth in this Act regarding the provision of a 18hearing for the discipline of a license. 19    (b) The Department has the authority and power to 20investigate any and all unlicensed activity. 21    (c) The civil penalty shall be paid within 60 days after 22the effective date of the order imposing the civil penalty. 23The order shall constitute a judgment and may be filed and 24execution had thereon in the same manner from any court of 25record.   SB2307- 14 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1    (d) The commission of a single act prohibited by this Act 2or prohibited by the rules promulgated under this Act or a 3violation of a disciplinary order issued under this Act 4constitutes a violation of this Act.  5    Section 55. Denial, suspension, and revocation of 6licenses. The Department may by order refuse to issue or renew 7a license, may place on probation, suspend, or revoke any 8license, or may censure, reprimand, or otherwise discipline or 9impose a civil penalty not to exceed $25,000 upon any licensee 10hereunder for one or any combination of the following: 11    (a) when the applicant or licensee has, by false or 12fraudulent representation, obtained or sought to obtain a 13license; 14    (b) when the applicant or licensee has been convicted of 15any crime, an essential element of which is dishonesty or 16fraud or larceny, embezzlement, or obtaining money, property, 17or credit by false pretenses or by means of a confidence game, 18has been convicted in this or another state of a crime that is 19a felony under the laws of this State or has been convicted of 20a felony in a federal court. 21    The Department may adopt rules further specifying and 22defining actions and omissions that constitute fraudulent, 23deceptive, or dishonest practices, and establishing standards 24of conduct for licensees.    SB2307- 15 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1    Section 60. Grounds for suspension of license. The 2Department may temporarily suspend a license and call for a 3hearing when findings show one or more of the following: 4    (a) That the licensee obtained or conspired with others to 5obtain a license by inducing the issuance of the license in 6consideration of the payment of money or delivery of any other 7thing of value or by and through misrepresentation of facts. 8    (b) That the licensee knowingly and willfully violated any 9law of this State or any rules, regulation, or code regulating 10electrical wiring installations, or licensed electricians. 11    (c) That the licensee has been found guilty in a court of 12law of negligence or incompetence in the performance of 13installation of electrical wiring and the Department after a 14hearing determines that the licensee poses a danger to the 15public safety. 16    (d) That the licensee has loaned or in any manner 17transferred his or her license to another person. If a license 18is suspended or revoked, the license shall be surrendered to 19the Department but it shall be returned to the licensee upon 20the termination of the suspension period.  21    Section 65. Continuation of business by estates. Upon the 22death of a supervising electrician who is an electrical 23contractor, the Department may permit the decedent's 24representative to carry on the business of the decedent for a 25period not in excess of 6 months, for the purpose of completing   SB2307- 16 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1work under contract or otherwise to comply with this Act. The 2decedent's representative may petition the Board for an 3extension of the 6 month period in the event he or she can 4demonstrate undue hardship or other special circumstances. The 5extension may be granted at the recommendation of the Board, 6subject to Department approval. The representative shall give 7any bond as the Department may require conditioned upon the 8faithful and lawful performance of the work. The bond shall be 9for the benefit of persons injured or suffering financial loss 10by reason of failure of performance. The bond shall be written 11by a corporate surety licensed to do business in the State of 12Illinois. The decedent's representative shall also comply with 13all public liability and property damage insurance 14requirements imposed by this Act upon a licensed electrical 15contractor.  16    Section 70. Exemptions from licensing.17    (a) Employees of, or independent contractors performing 18work for, any electric utility or electric utility affiliate, 19or communications or railway utility or any electric system 20owned and operated by a governmental unit (notwithstanding any 21other provision of this Act), electric cooperative as defined 22in Section 3.4 of the Electric Supplier Act, telephone or 23telecommunications cooperative as defined in Section 13-212 of 24the Public Utilities Act, or a telephone company shall not be 25required to hold a license under any of the following   SB2307- 17 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1conditions: 2        (1) While performing work on installations, materials, 3    or equipment that are owned or leased, operated, and 4    maintained by the electric utility or electric utility 5    affiliate, communications or railway utility, electric 6    system owned and operated by a municipal corporation or 7    unit of local government, electric, telephone, or 8    telecommunications cooperative, or telephone company in 9    the exercise of its utility or telephone function, and 10    that (i) are used exclusively for the generation, 11    transformation, distribution, transmission, or metering of 12    electric current, or the operation of railway signals, or 13    the transmission of intelligence and do not have as a 14    principal function the consumption or use of electric 15    current by or for the benefit of any person other than the 16    electric utility or electric utility affiliate, 17    communications or railway utility, electric system owned 18    and operated by a municipal corporation or unit of local 19    government, electric, telephone, or telecommunications 20    cooperative, or telephone company and (ii) are generally 21    accessible only to employees of the electric utility or 22    electric utility affiliate, communications or railway 23    utility, electric system owned and operated by a municipal 24    corporation or unit of local government, electric, 25    telephone, or telecommunications cooperative, or telephone 26    company or persons acting under its control or direction.   SB2307- 18 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1        (2) While performing work on installations, materials, 2    or equipment that are a part of the street lighting 3    operations of the utility. 4        (3) While installing or performing work on outdoor 5    area lights that are directly connected to a utility's 6    distribution system and located upon the utility's 7    distribution poles, and are generally accessible only to 8    employees of the utility or persons acting under its 9    control or direction. 10    (b) Any city, village, or incorporated town having a 11population of 500,000 or more may, by an ordinance containing 12provisions substantially the same as those in this Act and 13specifying educational or experience requirements equivalent 14to those prescribed in the Act, provide for a board of 15electrical examiners to conduct examinations for, and to 16issue, suspend, or revoke, electricians' licenses within the 17city, village, or incorporated town. Upon the enactment of 18such an ordinance, the provisions of this Act shall not apply 19within that municipality except as otherwise provided in this 20Act. Any person licensed as an electrical contractor by the 21Department under this Act, may engage in electrical wiring 22installation anywhere in this State. 23    (c) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prevent the 24practice of architecture as defined in the Illinois 25Architecture Practice Act of 1989 or the practice of 26professional engineering as defined in the Professional   SB2307- 19 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1Engineering Practice Act of 1989 or the practice of structural 2engineering as defined in the Structural Engineering Licensing 3Act of 1989. 4    (d) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prevent an 5owner or operator of a farm or his or her employees from 6installing, making additions to, altering, maintaining, or 7repairing wiring, apparatus, or equipment for electric light, 8heat, or power on the farm that he or she owns or operates. For 9purposes of this subsection, "farm" means land or a building 10appurtenant to land that is used for an agricultural purpose 11or for a purpose accessory to an agriculture purpose. 12    (e) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to restrict the 13activities of an employee of a manufacturing corporation to 14engage in activities incidental to operation or maintenance of 15its existing business and facilities; however, provisions of 16this Act do apply to new construction that results in the 17expansion of the existing business or facilities of a 18manufacturing corporation.  19    Section 75. Display of license. Persons who advertise 20electrical wiring services shall, at their place of business, 21display the electrical contractor license and shall identify 22the licensed supervising electrician(s) currently employed by 23them. When advertising electrical wiring services, the 24electrical contractor license number shall be included in all 25forms of written or printed advertising and included on all   SB2307- 20 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1contractor vehicles.  2    Section 80. Safety standards. All electrical wiring, 3apparatus, and equipment for electric light, heat, and power 4shall comply with the rules of the Department, as applicable, 5and be installed in conformity with accepted standards of 6construction for safety to life and property. 7    For the purposes of this Act, the regulations and safety 8standards stated at the time the work is done in the then most 9recently published edition of the National Electrical Code as 10adopted by the National Fire Protection Association, Inc. and 11approved by the American National Standards Institute, and the 12National Electrical Safety Code as published by the Institute 13of Electrical and Electronics Engineers, Inc. and approved by 14the American National Standards Institute, shall be prima 15facie evidence of accepted standards of construction for 16safety to life and property. Nothing in this Act shall 17prohibit any political subdivision from making and enforcing 18more stringent requirements than set forth in this Act and 19those requirements shall be complied with by all licensed 20electricians working within the jurisdiction of that political 21subdivision; except that nothing in this Act shall be 22construed to give a political subdivision the authority to 23apply those standards or requirements to electrical work 24performed on a farm.    SB2307- 21 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1    Section 85. Local Inspections. Any political subdivision 2may make provision for inspection of electrical installations 3within its jurisdiction, in which case it shall keep on file 4with the Department copies of its current inspection 5ordinances and codes. Any political subdivision may require 6any individual, partnership, corporation, or other business 7association holding a license from the Department to pay any 8license, registration fee, or permit fees provided however, 9that any political subdivision may provide by ordinance a 10requirement that each individual, partnership, corporation, or 11other business association doing electrical work within the 12jurisdiction of the political subdivision have on file with 13the political subdivision a copy of the current license issued 14by the Department or other evidence of the license as may be 15provided by the Department.  16    Section 90. Order of suspension. An order of suspension, 17revocation, or reinstatement of a license, or of dismissal of 18a complaint or petition, or a certified copy of an order, over 19the seal of the Department and purporting to be signed by the 20Director, shall be prima facie proof that: 21    (1) the signature is the genuine signature of the 22Director; and 23    (2) the Director is duly appointed and qualified.  24    Section 95. Manufacturing of electrical apparatus;   SB2307- 22 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1exemption. Electrical components, apparatus, or appliances 2being manufactured within the limits of property that is owned 3or leased by a manufacturer and the manufacturer's production 4employees shall not be covered by this Act. Installation or 5repair of electrical appliance units, except (i) electrical 6wiring to the unit, or (ii) original wiring in or on the unit 7installed outside the limits of property that is owned or 8leased by a manufacturer shall not be covered by this Act.  9    Section 100. Violations.10    (a) Any person violating Section 25 of this Act shall be 11guilty of a business offense and fined a minimum of $100 for 12the first offense. A second or subsequent violation of Section 1325 of this Act shall be a Class A misdemeanor with a minimum 14fine of $200. The State's Attorney of the County in which the 15violation occurred or the Attorney General shall prosecute 16these actions in the name of the People of the State of 17Illinois. 18    (b) If it is established that the defendant, contrary to 19this Act, has been engaging, is engaging, or is about to engage 20in electrical work without having been issued a license, or 21has been engaging or is about to engage in electrical work 22after his or her license has been suspended or revoked or after 23his or her license has not been renewed, the Court may enter a 24decree enjoining the defendant from further engaging in 25electrical work contrary to this Act. In case of a violation of   SB2307- 23 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1any injunction issued under this Section, the Court may 2summarily try and punish the offender for contempt of court. 3Injunction proceedings shall be in addition to, and not in 4lieu of, all penalties and other remedies in this Act.  5    Section 105. Electricians practicing before this Act. 6Electrical contractors who are in the business on January 1, 72027 and who file a license application with the Department 8within 180 days after the effective date of this Act shall be 9granted a license that shall be valid for one year from the 10date of issuance. These licenses shall be subject to annual 11renewal as provided in this Act. 12    Persons who have 2 years experience as provided in Section 1325 of this Act in performing electrical work on or after July 141, 2027 or who have successfully completed an examination for 15a similar license provided by a governmental unit, and who 16file a license application with the Department within 180 days 17after July 1, 2027 shall be granted a supervising 18electrician's license that shall be valid for one year from 19the date of issuance. These licenses shall be subject to 20annual renewal as provided in this Act.  21    Section 120. Administrative Procedure Act; application. 22The provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act 23are expressly adopted and shall apply to all administrative 24rules and procedures of the Department under this Act, except   SB2307- 24 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1that Section 5 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act 2relating to procedures for rulemaking does not apply to the 3adoption of any rule required by federal law in connection 4with which the Department is precluded by law from exercising 5any discretion.  6    Section 125. Review under Administrative Review Law. All 7final administrative decisions of the Director under this Act 8shall be subject to judicial review under the Administrative 9Review Law and its rules.  10    Section 130. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 11the licensing of electricians and electrical contractors in a 12manner inconsistent with the regulation by the State of 13electricians and electrical contractors. This Section is a 14limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of 15the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home 16rule units of powers and functions exercised by the State.  17    Section 135. Electrical Safety Standards Fund. The 18Electrical Safety Standards Fund is created as a special fund 19in the State treasury. All fees and fines collected under this 20Act shall be deposited into the Fund. All money in the 21Electrical Safety Standards Fund may be used, subject to 22appropriation, by the Department for the administration of 23this Act.    SB2307- 25 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1    Section 140. Time limit on action. No action may be taken 2by the Department against any person for violation of the 3terms of this Act or its rules unless the action is commenced 4within 5 years after the occurrence of the alleged violation.  5    Section 145. Building Trades Licensing Task Force. 6    (a) The Building Trades Licensing Task Force is created 7within the Department of Financial and Professional 8Regulation. The purpose of the Task Force is to review and 9study the necessity and feasibility of establishing licensing 10programs for workers involved in the construction industry who 11are not currently required to be licensed in this State.12    (b) As used in this Section, "construction industry" means 13any constructing, altering, reconstructing, repairing, 14rehabilitating, refinishing, refurbishing, remodeling, 15remediating, renovating, custom fabricating, maintenance, 16landscaping, improving, wrecking, painting, decorating, 17demolishing, and adding to or subtracting from any building, 18structure, highway, roadway, street, bridge, alley, sewer, 19ditch, sewage disposal plant, water works, parking facility, 20railroad, excavation or other structure, project, development, 21real property or improvement, or the performance of any part 22of that work, whether or not the performance of the work 23involves the addition to or the fabrication into any 24structure, project, development, real property or improvement   SB2307- 26 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1described in this Section of any material or article of 2merchandise.3    (c) The Task Force shall consist of the following members:4        (1) one member of the Senate appointed by the 5    President of the Senate;6        (2) one member of the Senate appointed by the Minority 7    Leader of the Senate;8        (3) one member of the House appointed by the Speaker 9    of the House;10        (4) one member of the House appointed by the Minority 11    Leader of the House;12        (5) one member appointed by the Governor;13        (6) one member representing the Department of 14    Financial and Professional Regulation appointed by the 15    Secretary of Financial and Professional Regulation;16        (7) three members representing management in the 17    construction industry appointed by the Governor;18        (8) three members representing unions that have 19    members who perform work in the construction industry 20    appointed by the Governor;21        (9) one member representing the interests of State 22    municipalities appointed by the Governor;23        (10) one member representing the interests of State 24    counties appointed by the Governor; and25        (11) one member appointed by the Governor, who shall 26    be designated the chairperson of the Task Force by the   SB2307- 27 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1    Governor.2    (d) All appointments to the Task Force shall be made 3within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.4    (e) Vacancies in the Task Force shall be filled by the 5initial appointing authority within 30 days after the vacancy 6occurs.7    (f) The members of the Task Force shall serve without 8compensation.9    (g) The Task Force shall receive the assistance of 10legislative staff. The Task Force may employ skilled experts 11with the approval of the chairperson, and shall receive the 12cooperation of those State agencies it deems appropriate to 13assist the Task Force in carrying out its duties.14    (h) The members of the Task Force shall have voting 15rights. A quorum of the Task Force shall consist of a simple 16majority of the members of the Task Force. All actions and 17recommendations of the Task Force must be approved by a simple 18majority vote of the members.19    (i) The Task Force shall meet initially at the call of the 20Governor no later than 90 days after the effective date of this 21Act, and shall thereafter meet at the call of the chairperson.22    (j) The Office of the Governor shall provide 23administrative and other support to the Task Force.24    (k) The Task Force shall:25        (1) discuss whether State residents would benefit from 26    legislation requiring workers in trades associated with   SB2307- 28 -LRB104 11260 AAS 21344 b1    the construction industry to obtain a statewide license 2    from the Department of Financial and Professional 3    Regulation;4        (2) if it is determined that licensure for a 5    particular trade associated with the construction industry 6    is beneficial, determine:7            (A) the requirements applicants must meet to 8        qualify for a license;9            (B) the grounds for denial or revocation of a 10        license; and11            (C) any other considerations relevant to a 12        licensing requirement; and13        (3) make recommendations to the General Assembly.14    (l) No later than January 1, 2028, the Task Force shall 15summarize its findings and recommendations in a report to the 16General Assembly. Upon filing its report, the Task Force is 17dissolved.18    (m) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2029. 19    Section 150. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 20Section 5.1030 as follows: 21    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)22    Sec. 5.1030. The Electrical Safety Standards Fund. 23    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect 24January 1, 2027.